Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Qualification and Application Procedures.

Sec. 43.82.100.
Qualified project.

Based on information available to the commissioner, the commissioner may determine that a proposal for new investment is a qualified project under this chapter if the project

principally involves

the transportation of natural gas by pipeline to one or more markets, together with any associated processing or treatment;

the export of liquefied natural gas from the state to one or more other states or countries; or

any other technology that commercializes the shipment of natural gas within the state or from the state to one or more other states or countries;

would produce at least 500,000,000,000 cubic feet of stranded gas within 20 years from the commencement of commercial operations; and

is capable, subject to applicable commercial regulation and technical and economic considerations, of making gas available to meet the reasonably foreseeable demand in this state for gas within the economic proximity of the project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 4 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.82.110.
Qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group.

The commissioner may determine that a person or group is a qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group if the person or a member of the group

intends to own an equity interest in a qualified project, intends to commit gas that it owns to a qualified project, or holds the permits that the department determines are essential to construct and operate a qualified project; and

meets one or more of the following criteria:

owns a working interest in at least 10 percent of the stranded gas proposed to be developed by a qualified project;

has the right to purchase at least 10 percent of the stranded gas proposed to be developed by a qualified project;

has the right to acquire, control, or market at least 10 percent of the stranded gas proposed to be developed by a qualified project;

has a net worth equal to at least 10 percent of the estimated cost of constructing a qualified project;

has an unused line of credit equal to at least 15 percent of the estimated cost of constructing a qualified project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 4 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.82.120.
Applications.

A qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group may submit to the department an application for development of a contract under AS

43.82.020

evidencing that the requirements of AS

43.82.100

and

43.82.110

are met. The application must be submitted in the manner and form and contain the information required by the department.

Along with an application submitted under (a) of this section, an applicant shall submit a proposed project plan for a qualified project that contains the following information based on the information known to the applicant at the time of application:

a description of the work accomplished as of the date of the application to further the project;

a schedule of proposed development activity leading to the projected commencement of commercial operations of the project;

a description of the development activity proposed to be accomplished under the proposed project plan;

a description of each lease or property that the applicant believes to contain the stranded gas that would be developed if the project was built;

a description of the methods and terms under which the applicant is prepared to make gas available to meet the reasonably foreseeable demand in this state for gas within the economic proximity of the project during the term of the proposed contract, including proposed pipeline transportation and expansion rules if pipeline transportation is a part of the proposed project;

a detailed description of options to mitigate the increased demand for public services and other negative effects caused by the project;

a detailed description of options for the safe management and operation of the project once it is constructed;

other information that the commissioner of revenue, in consultation with the commissioner of natural resources, considers necessary to make a determination that

the work accomplished as of the date of application, the schedule of proposed development activity, and the development activity proposed to be accomplished under the proposed project plan reflect a proposal for diligent development on the part of the applicant;

the proposed project plan does not materially conflict with the obligations of a lessee to the state under a lease or under a pool, unit, or other agreement with the state; and

the proposed project plan describes satisfactory methods and terms for accommodating reasonably foreseeable demand for gas in this state within the economic proximity of the project during the term of the proposed contract.

The requirements of (b) of this section do not diminish the obligations of a qualified sponsor or member of a qualified sponsor group to the state or restrict the authority of the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner of natural resources under any other law or agreement relating to a plan of development for a lease, pool, or unit.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.130.
Qualified project plan.

A proposed project plan submitted under AS

43.82.120

may be approved as a qualified project plan under AS

43.82.140

if the proposed project plan

reflects a proposal for diligent development of the project on the part of the applicant;

does not materially conflict with the obligations of a lessee to the state under a lease or under a pool, unit, or other agreement with the state; and

describes satisfactory methods and terms for making gas available to meet the reasonably foreseeable demand in this state for gas within the economic proximity of the project during the term of the proposed contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.140.
Review of applications and determination of qualifications.

The commissioner shall review an application submitted under AS

43.82.120

to determine whether the provisions of AS

43.82.100

concerning a qualified project and AS

43.82.110

concerning a qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group have been met. The commissioner may approve an application only if those provisions have been met.

If the commissioner approves an application under (a) of this section, the commissioner and the commissioner of natural resources shall review the proposed project plan submitted with the application to determine whether the provisions of AS

43.82.130

have been met. The commissioner may approve the proposed project plan as a qualified project plan only if the commissioner of natural resources concurs in the approval.

The commissioner shall send to the applicant written notice of and the reasons for the determinations made under (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.150.
Actions challenging determinations on applications.

Only an applicant under AS

43.82.120

who is aggrieved by a determination of the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner of natural resources under AS

43.82.140

may seek judicial review of the determination.

The only grounds for judicial review of a determination made under AS

43.82.140

are

failure to follow the qualification and application procedures set out in AS

43.82.100

—

43.82.180

; or

abuse of discretion that is so capricious, arbitrary, or confiscatory as to constitute a denial of due process.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.160.
Multiple applications for similar or competing qualified projects.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits different qualified sponsors or different qualified sponsor groups from submitting applications under AS

43.82.120

relating to similar or competing qualified projects or prohibits the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner of natural resources from reviewing and approving applications and proposed project plans under AS

43.82.140

relating to similar or competing qualified projects.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.170.
Application deadline.

The commissioner of revenue or the commissioner of natural resources may not act on an application for a contract submitted under AS

43.82.120

unless the application is received by the Department of Revenue no later than March 31, 2005.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 4 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.82.180.
Withdrawal of applications.

Subject to the terms of a reimbursement agreement under AS

43.82.240

or other agreement with the Department of Revenue, the Department of Natural Resources, the commissioner of revenue, or the commissioner of natural resources affecting the withdrawal of an application, a qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group may withdraw an application submitted under AS

43.82.120

at any time before the date that the commissioner of revenue submits a contract to the governor under AS

43.82.430

without further obligation under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)